pt-BR: Ajuste da chama: Ajustável; Fixo; Multinível; Outro
cs: Nastavení plamene: Nastavitelné; Pevné nastavení; Víceúrovňové nastavení; Jiné
ja: 炎の調整: 調整可能; 固定; マルチレベル; その他
ru: Регулировка пламени: Плавная регулировка; Фиксированное пламя; Многоуровневая регулировка; Другое
nl: Vlamregeling: Verstelbaar; Vast; Meerdere verdiepingen; Overig
hr-HR: Podešavanje plamena: Podesivo; Fiksno; Više razina; Ostalo
da: Flammejustering: Justerbar; Fast; Multiniveau; Andet
sl-SI: Nastavitev plamena: Prilagodljivo; Fiksna; Več nivojev; Druga
es: Ajuste de la llama: Ajustable; Fijo; Multinivel; Otros
th: การปรับเปลวไฟ: แบบปรับได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; บันไดมีชานพัก; อื่นๆ
el: Ρύθμιση φλόγας: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Σταθερή; Πολλαπλών επιπέδων; Άλλο
sv: Flamjustering: Justerbar; Fast; Flera nivåer; Övrigt
nb: Flammejustering: Regulerbar; Fast; Flernivå; Annet
vi: Điều chỉnh ngọn lửa: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Đa cấp; Khác
zh-CN: 火焰调节: 可调节; 固定; 多级调节; 其他
pl: Regulacja płomienia: Regulowane; Stałe; Wielostopniowe; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 火焰調節: 可調節式; 固定; 多段式; 其他
pt-PT: Ajuste da chama: Ajustável; Fixo; Multinível; Outro
bg-BG: Регулиране на пламъка: Регулируемо; Фиксирано; Много нива; Друго
sk-SK: Nastavenie plameňa: Nastaviteľný; Pevný; Viacúrovňový; Iné
fi: Liekin säätö: Säädettävä; Pysyvä; Monitasoinen; Muu
hu: Lángbeállítás: Állítható; Rögzített; Többszintű; Egyéb
it: Regolazione della fiamma: Regolabile; Fisso; Multilivello; Altro
lt-LT: Liepsnos reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kelių lygių; Kita
ro-RO: Reglarea flăcării: Reglabil; Fix; Multinivel; Altele
en: Flame adjustment: Adjustable; Fixed; Multi-level; Other
ko: 화염 조절: 조절식; 고정; 다층; 기타
de: Flammenregulierung: Einstellbar; Befestigt; Mehrstufig; Sonstiges
tr: Alev ayarı: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Çok katlı; Diğer
fr: Réglage de la flamme: Ajustables; Fixé; Multi-niveau; Autre